Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 33. Human Services

Executive Order No. 33-1
(No. 03-73) [Cash Recipients of Social Services.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 33-2
(No. 02-77) [Licensing and Regulation Division, Human Services Agency.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 33-3
(No. 19-78) [Positions Transferred to Human Services Agency.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 33-4
(No. 28-79) [Work Incentive Program.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 33-5
(No. 33-79) [Transfer of Typist C Position From Office of Secretary of State to Division of Vital Statistics, Department of Health, Agency of Human Services.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 33-6
(No. 40-79) [Transfer of Van, Utility Driver and Mail Clerk A From Agency of Administration, Division of Purchasing, to Agency of Human Services, Central Office.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 33-7
(No. 51-80) [North East Kingdom Community Action, Inc.

WHEREAS, the United States Community Services Administration has determined not to refund Orleans County Council of Social Agencies, Inc. leaving the residents of Caledonia, Essex and Orleans Counties without a Community Action Agency; and

WHEREAS, a Community Action Agency offers significant promise in its mission to mobilize resources to lift the economic condition of the poor and offer them the social, cultural and economic advantages enjoyed by the more fortunate residents of the State;
and

WHEREAS, the Community Action Agencies of Vermont, including Orleans County Council of Social Agencies, Inc., were designated by the Governor of the State of Vermont by Executive Order on June 20, 1968.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, Governor of the State of Vermont, by Executive Order, do hereby designate North East Kingdom Community Action, Inc. to serve the towns, villages and cities in the Counties of Caledonia, Essex and Orleans.

The named agency shall work cooperatively with the other Community Action Agencies in the State and with the State Economic Opportunity Office as well as other state agencies in the planning, development, implementation, and evaluation of programs to
be carried out within the State of Vermont under the auspices of Economic Opportunity Act of 1964, as amended.

Dated July 3, 1980.

Executive Order No. 33-8
(No. 48-87) [Housing Roundtable.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 33-9
(No. 16-93) [Vermont Commission on National and Community Service.

Superseded by Executive Order No. 09-98 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-35), effective August 13, 1998.

Executive Order No. 33-10
(No. 02-95) [Vermont Housing Council.

Rescinded by Executive Order No. 33-22 (codified as Executive Order No. 08-11), dated June 16, 2011.

Executive Order No. 33-11
(No. 18-03) [Vermont Interagency Council on Homelessness.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 33-15 (codified as Executive Order No. 06-05), dated August 31, 2006.

Executive Order No. 33-12
(No. 05-04) [Building Bright Futures: Vermont’s Alliance for Children Transitional Board.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 33-14 (codified as Executive Order 03-06), dated June 5, 2006.

Executive Order No. 33-13
(No. 02-05) [Governor’s Commission on Healthy Aging.

Expired by its own terms, effective March 1, 2011.

Executive Order No. 33-14
(No. 03-06) [Building Bright Futures Council: A Public/Private Partnership.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 1-08 (codified as Executive Order No. 33-17), dated February 8, 2008.

Executive Order No. 33-15
(No. 05-06) [Vermont Interagency Council on Homelessness.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 33-24 (codified as Executive Order No. 03-12), dated January 25, 2012.

Executive Order No. 33-16
(No. 05-07) [Vermont Developmental Disabilities Council.

WHEREAS, Congress recognizes that disabilities are a natural part of the human experience that do not “diminish the right of individuals with developmental disabilities to live independently, to exert control and choice over their own lives, and fully
participate in and contribute to their communities through full integration and inclusion in the economic, political, social, cultural, and educational mainstream” of society, 42 U.S.C. § 15001;

WHEREAS, it is the purpose of the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act 2000, 42 U.S.C. 15001 et seq. (hereinafter the Act), “to assure that individuals with developmental disabilities and their families participate in the design
of and have access to needed community services, individualized supports, and other forms of assistance that promote self-determination, independence, productivity, and integration and inclusion in all facets of community life, through
culturally competent program” authorized under the Act; and

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont and its various departments and agencies provide services to individuals with developmental disabilities and their families in order to provide the information, skills, opportunities, and support necessary to achieve full
integration and inclusion in society; and

WHEREAS, individuals with developmental disabilities often require lifelong community services, individualized supports, and other forms of assistance, that are most effective when provided in a coordinated manner; and

WHEREAS, individuals with developmental disabilities and their families are the primary decision-makers regarding the services and support such individuals and their families receive and they should contribute to policy decisions and program development
that affect their lives; and

WHEREAS, our communities are enriched by the contributions of individuals with developmental disabilities and their families who participate fully and actively in community activities and, with education and support, communities can become more accessible
and responsive to their needs.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby establish the Vermont Developmental Disabilities Council to engage in advocacy, capacity building, and systemic
change activities consistent with the purposes and policies of the Act that contribute to a coordinated, comprehensive system of needed community services, individualized supports, and other forms of assistance that promote self-determination
of individuals with developmental disabilities and their families.

In the implementation of its charge, the Council shall:

Conduct a comprehensive review and analysis of the adequacy of services, supports and other assistance available to individuals with developmental disabilities and their families in Vermont, including a description of service systems and policies, and
the extent of direct benefits and unmet needs;

Develop a 5-year strategic State plan through a planning process that includes stakeholder input and is derived from identified unmet needs of individuals and families;

Inform the Governor and other policymakers annually about issues impacting the lives of individuals with developmental disabilities and their families;

Implement the State plan by providing and supporting advocacy, capacity building, and systemic change activities such as outreach, training, technical assistance, support and education activities in communities, interagency collaboration and coordination,
coordination with related councils, committees, and programs, barrier elimination, systems design and redesign, coalition development, citizen participation, and demonstration projects;

Prepare, approve and implement a budget using amounts authorized by the Act;

Hire an Executive Director to supervise the staff of the Council, to approve and hire other staff, and to obtain other professional, technical, and clerical personnel consistent with state law determined by the Council to be necessary to carry out its
functions;

Submit periodic reports on the Council’s activities and outcomes as reasonably requested by the Secretary of U.S. Health and Human Services, keep records, and afford access as the Secretary finds necessary to verify those reports; and

Adopt by-laws, develop operating policies, and form such committees and task forces as may be required to undertake specific projects authorized by the Council.

The Council shall consist of no less than 21 and no more than 25 members as necessary to meet the requirements established in the Act, as that Act may from time to time be amended. Up to five members of the Council shall be representatives from the Agency
of Human Services designated by the Secretary and one member shall be a representative from the Vermont Department of Education designated by the Commissioner.

The Governor shall appoint all remaining members, at his discretion, and after soliciting recommendations as required by the Act. Members shall be geographically representative of the State and reflect the diversity of the State with respect to race and
ethnicity, and shall include:

(1)
One representative from Vermont Protection and Advocacy;

(2)
One representative from the University of Vermont Center on Disability & Community Inclusion;

(3)
Up to two representatives from local and non-governmental agencies and private nonprofit groups concerned with services for individuals for developmental disabilities in the State;

(4)
An additional number of members to constitute at least 60% of the Council membership as follows: 1/3 shall be individuals with developmental disabilities, 1/3 shall be parents or guardians of children with developmental
disabilities or immediate relatives or guardians of adults with disabilities, and 1/3 shall be a combination of these individuals provided that members under this subsection shall not be employees of a state agency or other
entity that receives funds or provides services under the Act. At least one of these members shall be an immediate relative or guardian of an individual with a developmental disability who resides or previously resided in an
institution.

The Council shall elect a Chair from among its members, subject to the approval of the Governor. Appointed members shall have the authority to engage in policy planning and implementation on behalf of their agency, department or program. Except for state
and public agency representatives, members of the Council may serve no more than two terms of three years each. Public members of the Council shall be entitled to appropriate support and reimbursement of expenses as described
in the Act and with available funds received under the Act.

The Agency of Human Services shall serve as the state agency designated to provide support to the Council on behalf of the state. The Council shall periodically review the activities of the designated state agency to assure that it is in compliance with
the Act.

This Executive Order supersedes and replaces Executive Order No. 05-94 (codified as No. 3-27), dated April 20, 1994. The Council created by this order, however, shall be a continuation of, and successor to, the Council established by Executive Order No.
05-94. Members of the Council on the effective date of this order shall continue to serve until the expiration of their terms and may be re-appointed unless a public member has served two terms.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall be reviewed at least every five years to ensure continuing compliance with the Act as it may from time to time be amended.

Dated August 14, 2007.

Executive Order No. 33-17
(No. 01-08) [Building Bright Futures Council: A Public/Private Partnership.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 33-19 (codified as Executive Order No. 06-09), dated June 27, 2009.

Executive Order No. 33-18
(No. 02-09) [SerVermont.

WHEREAS, Vermont has a long and proud heritage of neighbor helping neighbor that continues today; and

WHEREAS, there is growing awareness of volunteerism and civic participation as a means to address unmet social, environmental, educational, and public safety needs; and

WHEREAS, there is a need to foster an ethic of service and to support and recognize community service and volunteerism throughout our state; and

WHEREAS, a state commission is necessary to advise and assist in implementation of a comprehensive national and community service plan in Vermont.

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby establish the Vermont Commission on National and Community Service (hereafter the “Commission”), and do hereby order that the duties
of this commission shall be set out under section 201 of the National and Community Service Trust Act of 1993, as amended (hereafter the “Act”), codified at 42 U.S.C. § 16238, and shall include:

Provide an annual update to the three-year national service plan to the Corporation for National Service (hereafter the “Corporation”) as required under the Act that sets out priorities for, as well as addresses coordination of efforts in, community service
programs in Vermont;

Administer grants programs as required by the Act;

Provide technical assistance to Vermont non-profit organizations and other entities in applying for Corporation funds and in planning programs relating to community service; and

Disseminate information in Vermont relating to national service programs in a manner designed to ensure that interested Vermonters are aware of such opportunities.

Membership of the commission shall consist of no fewer than 15 and no more than 25 voting members. All members shall be appointed by the Governor to three-year terms.

Not more than 50% of the members plus one member shall be from the same political party. To the extent possible, membership shall be balanced according to race, ethnicity, age, disability, gender and geography.

Members shall include as voting members at least one of the following individuals: an individual with experience in the educational, training, and developmental needs of disadvantaged youth; a representative of community-based agencies or community-based
organizations within the state; an individual with experience in promoting the involvement of older adults in community service and volunteerism; an individual between the ages of 16 and 25 who is a participant or supervisor
in a volunteer or service program; a representative of a national service program as described in the Section 122(a) of the Act (codified at

42 U.S.C. § 12572(a))
; the Commissioner of the Vermont Department of Education or his or her designee, a representative of local government, a representative of a labor organization; and a representative of business.

The commission may also include as voting members representatives of the following groups: local educators; persons experienced in delivery of services in the areas of human services, education, the environment, or public safety; out-of-school youth or
other at-risk youth; and representatives of entities that receive assistance under the Domestic Volunteer Service Act of 1973 (42 U.S.C. 4950 et seq.). There shall also be a non-voting ex-officio representative of the Corporation
for National Service.

Not more than 25% of voting members may be state employees, although the Governor may appoint additional officers or employees of State agencies operating community service, youth service, education, social service, senior service and job training programs
to serve as ex-officio, non-voting members.

Vacancies occurring among the members shall be filled by the Governor to serve the balance of such terms. No member appointed after the effective date of this order shall serve more than two consecutive three-year terms.

In addition to the State of Vermont Executive Code of Ethics, commissioners shall abide by the limitation on voting as found in Section 221(a) of the Act (codified at

42 U.S.C. § 12638(d)
(2)).

The Commission shall meet at least four times a year to perform its business. The Commission shall receive administrative support from the Agency of Human Services. Public members may receive reimbursement of expenses in attending Commission meetings
and may receive a per diem pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010
.

The officers of the Commission shall be a Chairperson, Vice-Chairperson, Treasurer and Secretary and shall constitute the Executive Committee. Officers shall be elected annually by the voting members of the Commission at the first regular meeting of the
calendar year for a term of one year, commencing with the first meeting following their election subject to the approval of the Governor.

Officers may not hold office for more than three consecutive years. Following at least one year out of office, persons who have served as officers are again eligible for election. The Chair shall be an ex-officio member of all committees, with the exception
of the Nominating Committee, when one is established.

The Chair shall have authority to appoint committees as necessary and appropriate to carry out the functions and duties of the Commission, including a Finance Committee that shall be chaired by the Treasurer, that shall review the annual budget and make
recommendations.

This Executive Order supersedes Executive Order No. 09-98 (codified as E.O. 3-35), dated August 13, 1998 and rescinds and repeals any by-laws previously adopted by the Commission. The Commission created by this order, however, shall be a continuation
of, and successor to, the Commission established by Executive Order No. 09-98. Members of the Commission serving on the effective date of this order shall continue to serve until the expiration of their terms and may be re-appointed
for up to two additional consecutive terms.

This order shall take effect on January 23, 2009.

Dated January 21, 2009.

Executive Order No. 33-19
(No. 06-09) [Building Bright Futures: A Public/Private Partnership.

Expired by its own terms, effective June 30, 2010.

Executive Order No. 33-20
(No. 08-10) [Drug Utilization Review Board.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 33-26 (codified as Executive Order No. 07-19), dated September 5, 2019.

Executive Order No. 33-21
(No. 07-11) [Vermont Council on Interstate Juvenile Supervision.

WHEREAS, effective July 1, 2010, Vermont became a compacting state to the Interstate Compact for Juveniles pursuant to section 12 of Act 108 of the 2009 Adjourned Session;

WHEREAS, the Interstate Compact for Juveniles (“the compact”) requires each compacting state to create a state council for interstate juvenile supervision;

WHEREAS, pursuant to the compact each compacting state is required to appointed a compact administrator to administer and manage the state’s supervision and transfer of individuals subject to the compact; and

WHEREAS, each compacting state is entitled to one voting representative on the Interstate Commission for Juveniles (“the commission”);

NOW, THERE, I, Peter Shumlin hereby establish the Vermont Council on Interstate Juvenile Supervision (“the council”).

Council composition: The council shall be made up of the following:

a.
A representative from the Vermont Department of Children and Families (“DCF”), appointed by the commissioner of DCF, who shall serve as compact administrator and as the state’s representative on the commission;

b.
A representative from DCF, appointed by the commissioner of DCF, who shall serve as deputy compact administrator and who shall discharge the duties of the compact administrator in the administrator’s absence;

c.
One representative from the Vermont center for crime victims services to be appointed by the board of the Vermont center for crime victims services;

d.
One representative from the judiciary to be appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court; and

e.
One representative of the legislative branch appointed by the general assembly pursuant to a process determined by the joint rules committee.

Member’s terms: Each council member’s term shall begin on February 1 of odd-numbered years and shall continue for two years and until a successor is appointed. If a position becomes vacant during a term, it shall be filled in the manner described above
for the balance of that term. Members may be reappointed without limitation.

Council responsibilities: The council shall be advisory to DCF concerning the state’s participation in commission activities. In addition, the council may designate a designee to the commission if the compact administrator and deputy compact administrator
are unavailable.

Staffing: DCF shall carry out the state’s duties pursuant to the compact, and shall provide administrative support to the council.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated June 16, 2011.

Executive Order No. 33-22
(No. 08-11) [Vermont Housing Council.

WHEREAS, decent and affordable housing is a basic need of all Vermonters and an important component of a viable economy;

WHEREAS, there exists a significant and growing need among Vermonters to secure safe, decent and affordable housing, especially for families and those with low incomes;

WHEREAS, federal funds for housing have been substantially reduced and state and local housing resources remain limited;

WHEREAS, the price of unregulated fuels poses a threat to the sustainability of Vermont’s affordable housing stock and state policy requires investment in energy efficiency and renewable energy;

WHEREAS, the continued development of affordable housing involves myriad barriers that must be considered and evaluated so that affordability is achieved and maintained;

WHEREAS, the preservation of affordable housing at risk of loss as a result of deterioration or conversion is a state priority;

WHEREAS, Vermont’s role in the promotion of permanently affordable housing is recognized internationally; and

WHEREAS, cooperation and collaboration among state and federal agencies and housing providers is necessary to implement the state’s housing policy.

NOW, THERE, I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby order as follows:

The Vermont Housing Council is formed to coordinate and oversee implementation of the state’s housing policy, to evaluate housing services and initiatives, and to be a resource to housing providers in their efforts to supply decent and affordable housing
to Vermonters.

The Commissioner of the Department of Economic, Housing and Community Development (or designee) shall serve as chair of the Council. Other members shall include representatives of the Vermont State Housing Authority, the Vermont Housing Finance Agency,
the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board, the Vermont Association of Public Housing Directors, the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, the United States Department of Agriculture, the Vermont Agency of
Human Services, the Vermont Department of Public Safety, and the Division for Historic Preservation of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development. Appointees shall serve at the pleasure of the agencies they represent. The
Governor shall also appoint community members to represent each of the following interests: a statewide nonprofit housing developer, a regional nonprofit housing provider, a private sector housing provider, and a low-income advocate.
These four community members shall each serve two-year terms beginning February 1 in odd-numbered years, and until their successors are appointed and qualified.

The responsibilities of the Vermont Housing Council shall include, but not be limited to:

a.
reviewing and analyzing available information and data on housing resources and related issues including housing, energy and transportation costs for low and moderate- income Vermonters as well as credit availability,
foreclosures, regional development trends, and coordination between housing and services;

b.
recommending initiatives to increase the supply of smart growth sites for affordable housing, seeking the elimination of regulatory barriers for affordable housing and promoting the development of resources for
such housing;

c.
considering innovative private/public partnerships and initiatives designed to create and maintain housing opportunities for low-income Vermonters;

d.
providing an organized forum for the discussion of affordable housing issues and to propose reasonable solutions;

e.
recommending models of partnership among housing and human service providers to implement supportive housing solutions that alleviate homelessness, and reduce recidivism and institutionalization;

f.
recommending policies to the governor and congressional delegation that can improve Vermont’s access to resources, housing quality and affordability; and

g.
establishing subcommittees to address specific issues and develop recommended solutions.

The Council shall be attached to the Department of Economic, Housing and Community Development for administrative support. To the extent funds permit, community members shall receive reimbursement of expenses and a per diem pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010(e)
.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and rescinds Executive Order No. 02-95 (codified as Executive Order No. 33-10).

Dated June 27, 2011.

Executive Order No. 33-23
(No. 15-11) [Governor’s Commission on Successful Aging.

WHEREAS, Vermont places great value on the contributions of its older citizens; and

WHEREAS, it is important that older Vermonters maintain their health and remain active and involved in their communities; and

WHEREAS, encouraging older Vermonters to participate in the labor market will positively impact the State’s economic development and sustainability while at the same time result in improved physical, mental, emotional and financial well-being of older
Vermonters; and

WHEREAS, being physically active contributes substantially to healthy aging;

WHEREAS, a public health approach to successful aging has been shown to improve the health status of older adults and to prevent or delay unnecessary treatments and services;

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, establish the Governor’s Commission on Successful Aging.

Composition

The Commission shall consist of no more than 15 members, appointed by the Governor. Members shall be appointed by the Governor to three-year terms, beginning March 1 of the year of appointment or until their successors are appointed. (Initial appointments
shall take effect immediately and shall include the term beginning March 1, 2012.) Initially, one-third of the members shall be appointed to one-year terms, one-third to two-year terms, and one-third to three-year terms. No
member shall serve more than two consecutive terms.

Members shall include: the Commissioner of the Department of Disabilities, Aging and Independent Living or designee; a representative from the Vermont Department of Mental Health or designee; a representative from the Vermont Department of Health; the
Commissioner of the Department of Labor or designee; a representative of Creative Workforce Solutions; a representative of the Area Agencies on Aging; a representative of the American Association of Retired Persons (AARP);
a representative of the Community of Vermont Elders (COVE); a representative of a Vermont association of businesses; a representative from the Senior Community Service Employment Program; an individual representing Vermont’s
municipalities; a representative from the Vermont Agency of Transportation; two seniors who exemplify healthy aging through their work as community and/or business leaders. The Governor or the Governor’s designee shall chair
the Commission.

Committee Charge

To make recommendations to the Administration on the design and implementation of health reform initiatives, in order to promote healthy aging through the lifespan and to ensure reforms are responsive to the needs and preferences of older Vermonters;

To assist the Department of Disabilities, Aging and Independent Living, the Department of Labor, and other State agencies in optimizing the potential of Vermont’s older workers, including the implementation of a strategic approach to engaging older Vermonters
in the labor force;

To assist the Department of Disabilities, Aging and Independent Living, the Department of Health, and the Department of Mental Health in identifying potential sources of funding for health/mental health promotion programs and to make recommendations
regarding the pursuit of funding opportunities and implementation of programs;

To make recommendations to the Administration on ways to promote the creation of more livable communities for all ages by ensuring active, non-motorized transportation initiatives such as Complete Streets and Safe Streets are responsive to the needs and
preferences of older Vermonters.

Committee Process

The Commission shall meet at least three times annually or upon the call of the Chair and shall submit a report to the Governor each year by July 1.

The Commission shall be attached to the Department of Disabilities, Aging and Independent Living for administrative support. To the extent funds permit, members who are not employed by the state shall receive reimbursement of expenses and a per diem pursuant
to

32 V.S.A. § 1010(e)
.

Effective Dates

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall expire on November 30, 2016 unless extended by the Governor.

Dated November 8, 2011.

Executive Order No. 33-24
(No. 03-12) [Vermont Council on Homelessness.

WHEREAS, homelessness has been a persistent and growing problem within Vermont for 30 years; and

WHEREAS, homelessness assaults the human dignity of any individual affected, including children, young adults, working families, and veterans; and

WHEREAS, both the financial and human costs of homelessness strain public services including health care, mental health care, and education; and

WHEREAS, Vermont has a commitment to the quality of life for all of its citizens; and

NOW, THEREFORE BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby re-establish and re-constitute the Vermont Council on Homelessness.

Composition and Appointments

Members of the Council shall be appointed by the Governor for three years terms until their successors are appointed and qualified.

Members shall include: the Secretary of Human Services or designee; the Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health or designee; the Commissioner of the Department of Disabilities, Aging and Independent Living or designee; the Commissioner of Corrections
or designee; the Commissioner of the Department of Children and Families or designee; the Commissioner of the Department of Economic, Housing and Community Development or designee; the Commissioner of Education or designee;
the Executive Director of the Vermont State Housing Authority or designee; the Executive Director of the Vermont Housing Finance Agency or designee; the Executive Director of the Housing and Conservation Board or designee;
and

Six (6) representatives of entities engaged in preventing or addressing homelessness including representatives of shelter providers and the Continuum of Care;

Two (2) persons who have experienced homelessness and who are not otherwise included in another category;

Two (2) housing providers;

Two (2) at large members with a strong commitment to fighting homelessness.

Council Charge

The responsibilities of the Council shall include, but not be limited to:

A.
Developing a Ten Year Plan to End Homelessness in Vermont which shall include annual targets for reducing the number of homeless people in Vermont and shall set forth plans to implement specific initiatives, including
those developed at Governor Shumlin’s June 2011 Summit on Homelessness;

B.
Monitoring and revising the Ten Year Plan to End Homelessness as necessary; and

C.
Reporting to the Governor on July 1 of each calendar year regarding: (1) recommendations to the Administration regarding resource, policy, and regulatory changes necessary to accomplish the goals of the Plan, and
(2) progress made under the Plan.

Council Process.

The Governor shall appoint the Chair of the Council. The Council shall meet no less than quarterly. The Council shall establish sub-committees.

The Council shall be attached to the Agency of Human Services for administrative support. To the extent funds permit, community members shall receive reimbursement of expenses and a per diem pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010(e)
.

Effective Dates

This Order shall take effect upon signing and expire on December 31, 2022. This Order supersedes and replaces Executive Order 05-06 (codified as No. 33-15).

Dated January 25, 2012.

Executive Order No. 33-25
(No. 09-13) [Governor’s Council on Pathways From Poverty.

Expired by its own terms, effective January 15, 2017.

Executive Order No. 33-26
(No. 07-19) [Drug Utilization Review Board.

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont participates in the Medicaid program; and

WHEREAS, the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1990 (the “Act”), codified at 42 U.S.C.§ 1396r-8(g), requires the establishment of a drug use review program for states that participate in Medicaid; and

WHEREAS, the drug use review program must assure that outpatient drug claims for prescription drugs are appropriate, medically necessary and are not likely to result in adverse medical results; and

WHEREAS, the Act requires a Drug Use Review Board be established to carry out the requirements of the program under the sponsorship of the state Medicaid agency.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby amend and reconstitute a Drug Utilization Review Board (the “Board”), as follows:

Composition and Appointments.

The Drug Utilization Review Board created by this Executive Order shall be a continuation and successor to the Board established by Executive Order No. 08-10 (codified at Executive Order No. 33-20), dated September 8, 2010.

Members of the Board on the effective date of this Executive Order shall be reappointed by the Commissioner of the Department of Vermont Health Access and shall be divided into three classes, as nearly equal in number as possible, designated as Class
I, Class II and Class III. Class I members shall initially serve until August 31, 2020; Class II members shall initially serve until August 31, 2021; and Class III members shall initially serve until August 31, 2022. Board
members appointed to succeed members whose terms expire shall be appointed for staggered three-year terms expiring on August 31st of the third year following their appointment.

At least one-third, but not more than half, of the Board’s membership shall be licensed and actively practicing physicians appointed by the Commissioner of the Department of Vermont Health Access with the approval of the Governor.

At least one-third of the membership of the Board shall be licensed and actively practicing pharmacists appointed by the Commissioner of the Department of Vermont Health Access with the approval of the Governor.

The Board may include other members as proposed by the Commissioner of the Department of Vermont Health Access and approved by the Governor.

In case of any increase or decrease, from time to time, in the number of Board members, the number of members in each class shall be apportioned as nearly equally as possible.

The Chair shall be elected by vote of the members.

Charge.

The Board shall carry out the duties and responsibilities required by federal and State law and shall participate in the efforts of the Department of Vermont Health Access to assure that prescriptions for Medicaid patients are appropriate, medically necessary
and not likely to result in adverse medical results.

Specifically, the Board shall:

approve any standards utilized in both prospective and retrospective drug utilization review;

evaluate the results of the application of standards to Medicaid claims data to identify utilization patterns which suggest drug therapy problems;

determine the content and methodology of specific activities to educate practitioners on common therapy problems;

provide ongoing educational interventions for practitioners targeted through retrospective review; and

report annually to the Commissioner of the Department of Vermont Health Access concerning the nature and scope of retrospective drug utilization review and educational activity.

Members of the Board who are not otherwise employed by the State may receive per diem compensation in accordance with

32 V.S.A. § 1010(e)
, subject to the availability of funding.

The Board shall be attached to the Department of Vermont Health Access for administrative support.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall supersede and replace Executive Order No. 08-10 (codified at Executive Order No. 33-20), dated September 8, 2010.

Dated September 5, 2019